Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.32.060 and 2011 c 336 s 357 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the first degree when:(a) He or she recklessly causes the death of another person; ((or))(b) He or she intentionally and unlawfully kills an unborn quick child by inflicting any injury upon the mother of such child; or(c) He or she unlawfully delivers a controlled substance in violation of RCW 69.50.401(2) (a), (b), or (c) which controlled substance is subsequently used by the person to whom it was delivered, resulting in the death of the user.(2) Manslaughter in the first degree is a class A felony.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. RCW 69.50.415 (Controlled substances homicideâPenalty) and 2003 c 53 s 343, 1996 c 205 s 8, & 1987 c 458 s 2 are each repealed.--- END ---